Maine, session 132, LD1250.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3210, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2023, c. 361, §1, is further
amended to read:
3. Portfolio requirements; Class II resources. As a condition of licensing pursuant
to section 3203, each competitive electricity provider in this State must demonstrate in a
manner satisfactory to the commission that no less than 30% of its portfolio of supply
sources for retail electricity sales in this State is accounted for by Class II resources. If a
competitive electricity provider represents to a customer that the provider is selling to the
customer a portfolio of supply sources that includes more than 30% Class II resources, the
resources necessary to supply more than 30% of that customer's load may not be applied to
meet the aggregate 30% portfolio requirement. A portfolio requirement under this
subsection applies only to an actual retail electricity sale. Rules adopted under this
subsection are major substantive rules pursuant to Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
A. For the purposes of meeting the portfolio requirement under this subsection, a 300%
multiplier is applied to the output of a generator fueled by municipal solid waste in
conjunction with recycling that has obtained a solid waste facility license from the
Department of Environmental Protection.
This paragraph is repealed January 1, 2027.
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §3210, sub-§3-A, ¶A, as amended by PL 2019, c. 477, §1, is
further amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
Class I resources used to satisfy the requirements of this paragraph may not be used to
satisfy the requirements of subsection 3 or 3‑B. A portfolio requirement under this
paragraph applies only to an actual retail electricity sale.
Sec. 3. 35-A MRSA §3210, sub-§3-B, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 477, §1, is
amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
Class IA resources used to satisfy the requirements of this paragraph may not be used
to satisfy the requirements of subsection 3 or 3‑A. A portfolio requirement under this
paragraph applies only to an actual retail electricity sale.
Sec. 4. 35-A MRSA §3210, sub-§3-C, as amended by PL 2019, c. 576, §1, is
further amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
Retail electricity sales pursuant to a supply contract or standard-offer service arrangement
executed by a competitive electricity provider that is in effect on September 19, 2019 are
exempt from the requirements of this subsection until the end date of the existing term of
the supply contract or standard-offer service arrangement. A portfolio requirement under
this subsection applies only to an actual retail electricity sale.